Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.500

Greater voting requirements.

Whenever, with respect to any action to be taken by the members, shareholders or directors of a corporation, the articles of incorporation require the vote or concurrence of a greater proportion of the members, shareholders or directors, as the case may be, than required by this chapter with respect to such action, the provisions of the articles of incorporation shall control.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 100.]